Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2020.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1341.1(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1341.1. Personal organization registration plates.* * *(b) Additional fee.--* * *(3) For any personal plate issued under section 1365 (relating to Gold Star Family plate), the department may not collect an additional fee.Section 2. Section 1365(a) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1365. Gold Star Family plate.(a) General rule.--Upon application of a family member of a 123456789101112131415161718 person who was killed while serving on active duty in the military, accompanied by [a fee of $20 which shall be in addition to the annual registration fee and by] such documentation as the department shall require, the department shall issue to the family member a special registration plate designating the vehicle so licensed as belonging to a family member of a person who was killed while serving on active duty in the military. The department shall design and produce the special registration plate carrying the Service Flag Gold Star rimmed with blue which represents sacrifice to the cause of liberty and freedom. The words "Gold Star Family" shall be clearly displayed along the bottom of the plate. The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2020PN2579 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516